Utah statutes.
31A-14-217.   Revocation of certificate of authority.
Whenever there would be grounds for delinquency proceedings under Chapter 27a,
Insurer Receivership Act, against a foreign insurer, if the foreign insurer
were a domestic insurer, the commissioner may, after any proceeding authorized
by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, revoke, suspend, or
limit the foreign insurer's certificate of authority.  This action does not
affect insurance which has already been issued.  The insurer remains subject
to regulation until released under Section 31A-14-216.
